Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.110

Right to have and provide.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The state may not deny or interfere with a pregnant individual's right to choose to have an abortion prior to viability of the fetus, or to protect the pregnant individual's life or health.

A physician, physician assistant, *advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice may terminate and a health care provider may assist a physician, physician assistant, *advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice in terminating a pregnancy as permitted by this section.

[2022 c 65 s 3; 1992 c 1 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 120, approved November 5, 1991).]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Legislative affirmation—2022 c 65: See note following RCW 9.02.100.